Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6373.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 40-8 of the General Laws entitled "Medical Assistance" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
40-8-33. Payment parity for primary care services.
(a) Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) “Primary care billing and payment codes” means the primary care payment codes to be
used by health insurers to meet the primary care expenditure requirements established by the office
of the health insurance commissioner pursuant to §§ 42-14-5, 42-14-17 and 42-14.5-1, et seq.
(2) “Primary care provider” means a provider within the practice types of family medicine,
geriatrics, internal medicine, and pediatrics, as described by the primary care provider taxonomy
codes as defined in this section, and providers with the following professional credentials:
physicians, certified nurse practitioners, and physician assistants; except that a specialty medical
provider including, but not limited to, an obstetrics/gynecology or behavioral health provider, may
be considered a primary care provider if they meet any criteria set forth, or are otherwise designated
as such, pursuant to guidance or regulations issued by the executive office of health and human
services pursuant to § 42-7.2-11.
(3) “Primary care services” means services described by the primary care billing and
payment codes, as defined in this section, for:
(i) Care management;
(ii) Care planning;

(iii) Consultation services;
(iv) Health risk assessments, screening and health behavior counseling;
(v) Home visits;
(vi) Hospice and home health services;
(vii) Immunization administrations; and
(viii) Office visits and preventive medicine visits.
(4) “Primary care provider taxonomy codes” means the primary care specialty provider
taxonomy codes to be used by health insurers to meet the primary care expenditure requirements
established by the office of the health insurance commissioner pursuant to §§ 42-14-5, 42-14-17,
and 42-14.5-1, et seq.
(b) Achieving parity with Medicare rates for primary care services. The executive office of
health and human services shall pursue a Medicaid state plan amendment, waiver submission, or
any other necessary change in regulation or guidance, and shall allocate sufficient state general
revenue, to increase Medicaid payment rates for primary care services furnished by primary care
providers to equal no less than one hundred percent (100%) of Medicare rates. This increase shall
be effective beginning July 1, 2025.
(c) Implementation. In implementing this section, the executive office of health and human
services shall ensure that Medicaid managed care organizations shall pay no less than the rates that
would be paid for that care under subsection (b) of this section for these service types and shall
pursue any necessary amendment to, or any execution of, contracts with Medicaid managed care
organizations to promptly effectuate this provision. With respect to primary care services furnished
by primary care providers participating in the Medicaid accountable entity program, the executive
office of health and human services shall make any such payment adjustments as may be necessary
to ensure such entities receive an equivalent benefit, taking into account the financial methodology
of such program. With respect to primary care services furnished by primary care providers at
community health centers, the executive office of health and human services shall adjust the
alternative payment methodology under which community health centers are reimbursed as may
be necessary to ensure such centers receive an equivalent increase in reimbursement.
(d) Sunset. Unless extended by the general assembly, the provisions of this section shall
sunset and expire on June 30, 2027.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002954
========
LC002954 - Page 2 of 3